Washington statutes.
RCW 5.44.020

Foreign judgments for debt—Faith to be accorded.

Judgment for debt rendered in any other state or any territory against any person or persons residents of this state at the time of the rendition of such judgment, shall not be of any higher character as evidence of indebtedness than the original claim or demand upon which such judgment is rendered, unless such judgment shall be rendered upon personal service of summons, notice or other due process against the defendant therein.

[ 1891 c 31 s 1; Code 1881 s 739; 1877 p 150 s 744; 1869 p 171 s 681; 1866 p 88 s 1; RRS s 1255.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 44(a)(2).

Uniform enforcement of foreign judgments act: Chapter 6.36 RCW.